test/src/morphology/N-tyirye_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

# NB! In case of stem-final в the AccPl ending is бе, би.

  Noun - тир: # Noun 'cloud' - full paradigm /Type 12/
     тир+N+Sg+Nom: тир
     тир+N+Sg+Acc: тирамʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen: тирʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat: тиранʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc: тирхана
     тир+N+Sg+Abl: тирхад
     тир+N+Sg+Pros: тирувна
     тир+N+Du+Nom: тирхаʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc: тирхаʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen: тирхаʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Nom: тирˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Acc: [тире, тири]
     тир+N+Pl+Gen: [тиреˮ, тириˮ]
     тир+N+Pl+Dat: тирхаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc: тирхаˮна
     тир+N+Pl+Abl: тирхат
     тир+N+Pl+Pros: тиреˮмана        
     
     тир+N+Tra: тирӈэ
     тир+N+Car: тирсиˮ
     тир+N+Equ: тирдаремʼ
     тир+N+Equ+Lat: тирдаревʼ

# Possessive forms 

     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: тирв 
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тир  
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тирда 
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: тирмиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: тириʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тирдиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: тирваˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: тираˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тирдоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тирв   
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тирми  
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тирмд  
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тирмда 
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: тирмиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тирмдиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: тирмдиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: тирваˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тирмдаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: тирмдоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тирен   
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тирени  
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тиренд  
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тиренда 
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: тирениʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тирендиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тирендиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: тиренаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тирендаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тирендоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тирхан   
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тирхани  
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тирханд  
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тирханда 
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: тирханиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: тирхандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: тирхандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: тирханаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: тирхандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: тирхандоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тирханан   
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тирханани  
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: тирхананд  
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: тирхананда 
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: тирхананиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: тирханандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: тирханандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: тирхананаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: тирханандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: тирханандоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тирхадан   
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тирхадани  
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: тирхаданд  
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: тирхаданда 
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: тирхаданиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: тирхадандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: тирхадандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: тирхаданаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: тирхадандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: тирхадандоʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: тирхаюн  
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: тирхаюд  
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: тирхаюда 
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: тирхаюниʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: тирхаюнаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: тирхаюдаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: тирхаюдоʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: тирхаюн  
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: тирхаюд  
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: тирхаюда 
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: тирхаюниʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: тирхаюнаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: тирхаюдаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: тирхаюдоʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: тирхаюн  
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: тирхают  
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: тирхаюта 
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: тирхаюниʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: тирхаютиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: тирхаютиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: тирхаюнаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: тирхаютаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: тирхаютоʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тирен   
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тиред   
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тиреда  
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тирениʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тиренаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тиредаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тиредоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тирен   
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тиред   
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тиреда  
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тирениʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тиренаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тиредаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тиредоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тиреˮн  
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тирет   
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тирета  
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тиреˮниʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тиретиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тиретиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тиреˮнаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тиретаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тиретоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тирехэˮн 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: тирехэт 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: тирехэта 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: тирехэˮниʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: тирехэтиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: тирехэтиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: тирехэˮнаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: тирехэтаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: тирехэтоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: тирехэˮнан  
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: тирехэˮнат  
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: тирехэˮната 
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: тирехэˮнаниʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: тирехэˮнатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: тирехэˮнатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: тирехэˮнанаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: тирехэˮнатаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: тирехэˮнатоʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: тирехэтан 
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: тирехэтат 
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: тирехэтата 
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: тирехэтаниʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: тирехэтатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: тирехэтатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: тирехэтанаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: тирехэтатаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: тирехэтатоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тирувнан   
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тирувнани  
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: тирувнанд  
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: тирувнанда 
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: тирувнаниʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: тирувнандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: тирувнандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: тирувнанаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: тирувнандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: тирувнандоʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тиреˮманан  
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тиреˮманат  
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тиреˮманата 
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тиреˮмананиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тиреˮманатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тиреˮманатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тиреˮмананаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тиреˮманатаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тиреˮманатоʼ
     
# Predestinative 
               
     тир+N+Pred+Abs: тирад
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [тирдав, тирдув]
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: тирдар
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: тирдада
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [тирдав, тирдув]
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: тирдамд
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: тирдамда
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: тирдан
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: тирданд
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: тирданда
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: тирдамиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: тирдариʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: тирдадиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: тирдамиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: тирдамдиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: тирдамдиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: тирданиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: тирдандиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: тирдандиʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: тирдаваˮ
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: тирдараˮ
     тир+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: тирдадоʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: тирдаваˮ
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: тирдамдаˮ
     тир+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: тирдамдоʼ
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: тирданаˮ
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: тирдандаˮ
     тир+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: тирдандоʼ

# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тирадмʼ
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тиран 
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: тир
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: тирниʼ
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тирдиʼ
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тирхаʼ
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: тирваˮ
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тирдаˮ 
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тирˮ  
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тирдамзь
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тирнась 
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: тирась   
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: тирнинзь
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: тирдинзь
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тирханзь
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: тирваць 
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тирдаць  
     тир+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тираць  
